Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5206
Family practice residents; contract with other programs to assist in training; when; requirements.

If the College of Medicine of the University of Nebraska is unable to train the number of family practice residents provided for in section 71-5204, the college may, with the approval of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, contract with other associated programs which:

(1) Comply with the essentials for residency training in family practice as specified by the American Medical Association;

(2) Are approved or eligible for approval by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education;

(3) Are affiliated with an accredited medical school; and

(4) Are not receiving funds pursuant to section 71-5206.01.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 152, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 241, § 1.